Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4524
Terms of second trust.

A reference in the Nebraska Uniform Trust Code to a trust instrument or terms of the trust includes a second-trust instrument and the terms of the second trust.

Laws 2020, LB808, § 34.

Nebraska Uniform Trust Code, see section 30-3801.